Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.080

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this section and RCW 29A.56.082 through 29A.56.092 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Cast" means accepted by the secretary of state in accordance with RCW 29A.56.090(2).

(2) "Elector" means an individual selected as a presidential elector under RCW 29A.56.320 and 29A.56.082 through 29A.56.092.

(3) "President" means president of the United States.

(4) "Unaffiliated presidential candidate" means a candidate for president who qualifies for the general election ballot in this state by means other than nomination by a political party.

(5) "Vice president" means vice president of the United States.

[ 2019 c 143 s 2.]

NOTES:

Short title—2019 c 143: "This act may be known and cited as the uniform faithful presidential electors act." [ 2019 c 143 s 1.]

Uniformity of application and construction—2019 c 143: "In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it." [ 2019 c 143 s 9.]